de: Umwandlungsmechanismus des Futonrahmens: (Zweifach faltbar; Klick-Klack; Dreifach faltbar; Wall-Hugger); Sonstige
sl-SI: Mehanizem za preoblikovanje ogrodja futona: (Dvodelno zlaganje; Klik-klak; Trodelno zlaganje; Zložljivo ob steni); Drugo
vi: Cơ chế chuyển đổi khung ghế sofa: (Gấp đôi; Click-Clack; Gấp ba; Sát tường); Khác
pl: Mechanizm konwersja Futon Frame: (Bi-Fold; Klik-klak; Tri-Fold; Wall Hugger); Inny
lt-LT: Futono rėmo transformavimo mechanizmas: (Dvigubo lenkimo; „Click-Clack“; Trigubo lenkimo; Pristumiamas prie sienos); Kita
zh-CN: 蒲团框架转换机构: （双折; 咔哒折叠 (Click-Clack); 三折; 靠墙折叠）; 其他
fi: Vuodesohvan rungon mekanismi: (Kahtia taitettava; Click-clack; Kolmeen osaan taitettava; Wall hugger); Muu
fr: Mécanisme de conversion du cadre de futon: (Deux plis; Clic-clac; Trois plis; Gain de place); Autre
pt-PT: Mecanismo de conversão Futon Frame: (Dobrável em dois; Click-clack; Dobrável em três; Wall hugger); Outro
ro-RO: Mecanism de transformare a cadrului futonului: (Bi-Fold; Clic-clac; Pliere triplă; Wall Hugger); Altele
pt-BR: Mecanismo de conversão da estrutura do futon: (Com duas dobras; Click-clack; Com três dobras; Wall hugger); Outro
el: Μηχανισμός μετατροπής σκελετού φουτόν (futon): (Διπλή αναδίπλωση; Click-Clack; Τριπλή αναδίπλωση; Wall Hugger); Άλλο
it: Meccanismo di conversione Frame del futon: (A due pieghe; Clic clac; A tre pieghe; Salvaspazio); Altro
tr: Futon iskeletinin dönüşüm mekanizması: (İkiye katlanır; Klik klak; Üçe katlanır; Duvara sıfır); Diğer
hu: Futonváz átalakító mechanizmus: (Kétrészes; Kattanós; Háromrészes; Fal mellé állítható); Egyéb
en: Futon frame conversion mechanism: (Bi-Fold; Click-Clack; Tri-Fold; Wall Hugger); Other
nb: Futon-rammekonvertering/vekslingsmekanisme: (Dobbeltfoldet; Klikk-klakk; Tredelt; Plassbesparende (wall hugger)); Annet
es: Mecanismo de conversión del armazón del futón.: (Plegado doble; Clic-clac; Plegado triple; Ahorra espacio); Otro
bg-BG: Механизъм за трансформиране на рамката на футон: Сгъване на две (Bi-fold); Клик-клак; Сгъване на три (Tri-fold); Wall hugger; Друго
cs: Rozkládací mechanismus futonu: (Dvoudílný; Click-clack; Třídílný; Wall hugger); Ostatní
ja: 布団フレームFrameコンバージョンメカニズム: (二つ折り; クリッククラック; 三つ折り; ウォールハガー); その他
sv: Växlingsmekanism för futonram: (Tvådelad; Klick-klack; Tredelad; Väggnära); Övrigt
nl: Conversiemechanisme van futonframe: (Bifold; Klik-klak; Drievoudig; Wall hugger); Overig
da: Futonrammens konverteringsmekanisme: (Todelt; Klik-klak; Tredelt; Wall hugger); Andet
sk-SK: Mechanizmus zmeny futónového rámu: (Dvojdielny; Click-Clack; Trojdielny; Wall Hugger); Iný
th: กลไกที่ใช้ปรับเปลี่ยนโครงสร้างของโซฟาฟูก: (พับครึ่ง; ปรับระดับด้วยระบบเฟือง; พับสามทบ; ชิดผนัง); อื่นๆ
ko: 푸톤 프레임 변환 메커니즘: (2단 접이식; 클릭클랙; 3단 접이식; 월 허거); 기타
zh-TW: 沙發床架轉換機構: (雙折; 卡扣式 (Click-Clack); 三折; 靠牆式); 其他
ru: Механизм трансформации каркаса футон: (В два сложения; Клик-кляк; В три сложения; Без отступа от стены); Другое
hr-HR: Futon Frame mehanizam konverzije: (Dvodijelno preklopno; Click-Clack; Trodijelno preklopno; Ušteda prostora); Ostalo